Utah statutes.
77-10a-20.   Expenses of grand jury -- Appropriation -- Payment by state or
county.
(1) (a)  The expenses of operation of a grand jury summoned under this chapter
shall be paid by the Judicial Council, except under Subsection (2).
(b)  Expenses include grand juror fees, rental of a facility, cost of
transcripts, payment for a court reporter or electronic recording device,
secretarial services, and investigation and recorder staff.
(c)  For this purpose, an appropriation of $25,000 is made from the General
Fund to the Judicial Council as a separate line item in the budget of the
Judicial Council.
(d)  Any amount of this appropriation remaining at the end of the fiscal year
lapses into the General Fund.
(2) (a)  When a grand jury is summoned to investigate an allegation that is
determined to be primarily a county-related issue, the expenses of the grand
jury shall be paid by the county or counties involved.
(b)  The supervising judge shall determine before the grand jury is called if
the allegations involve primarily the state or a county or counties for
purposes of determining payment of expenses under this section.
(3)  The expenses of any grand jury and the compensation for any special
prosecutor appointed under this chapter shall be reviewed and approved or
disapproved by the clerk of the court under the direction of the managing
judge.
